Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1007
Enforcement; void marriage.

If a marriage is determined to be void, an agreement that would otherwise have been a premarital agreement is enforceable only to the extent necessary to avoid an inequitable result.

Laws 1994, LB 202, § 7.